District of Columbia statutes.
29A-1041

Repealed

Articles of merger or consolidation.

Repealed.

July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 42, 41 DCR 3010
Sept. 8, 1995, D.C. Law 11-38, § 2(h), 42 DCR 3269
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(s), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-1041.
1981 Ed., § 29-1341.